Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 State License Requirements and Regulations for Manufacture, Distribution, and Sale

Cross references.

Occupational taxes generally, T. 48, C. 13.

3-5-20.
Levy and amount of state occupational license tax; application for license.

An annual occupational license tax is imposed upon each brewer, manufacturer, broker, importer, wholesaler, and retail dealer of beer in this state, as follows:

Upon each brewer $ 1,000.00 (2) Upon each wholesale dealer 500.00 (3) Upon each importer 500.00 (4) Upon each broker 50.00 (5) Upon each retail dealer 50.00 (6) Upon each brewpub operator 1,000.00 (7) Upon each special event use permit applicant 50.00

Click to view

An annual occupational license tax shall be paid for each place of business operated. An application for the applicable license required pursuant to this title along with the payment of the tax required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be submitted to the department immediately upon assuming control of the place of business and annually thereafter for so long as the business is operated.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 73, § 5; Ga. L. 1937, p. 148, § 1; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 173, § 1; Ga. L. 1939, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 356, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, Ex. Sess., p. 23, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4501, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 734, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 827, § 5/HB 1066.

3-5-21.
Sale, offer for sale, or possession of bottles or cans not having prescribed identification on crowns or lids; alternate identification for use on certain imported bottles or containers.

The commissioner may prescribe by regulation that no person engaged in the business of selling, manufacturing, or distributing malt beverages specified in this chapter in bottles or cans may sell, offer for sale, or possess for the purpose of sale any bottles or cans containing such malt beverages unless the crowns or lids contain the word “Georgia” or its abbreviation, such as “GA.”

The commissioner may prescribe an alternate identification for certain bottles or containers of malt beverages manufactured in a foreign country and which have been imported into this state by a licensed importer, manufacturer, or wholesaler for resale.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-4502, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 790, § 2.

3-5-22.
[Reserved] Shipment of malt beverages within or into state without license prohibited; requirement as to furnishing of labels of beverages to be shipped into state for first time.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1983.

3-5-23.
License for manufacture of malt beverages — Grounds and procedure for revocation generally.

No license issued by the state or by any other duly authorized licensing authority to any person for the manufacture of malt beverages shall be revoked except for due cause.

Due cause for the revocation of a brewer’s license shall consist only of violation of the laws regulating the manufacture of malt beverages and of regulations made pursuant to authority lawfully granted for the purpose of regulating the manufacture of malt beverages.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 657, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4507, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-24.
License for manufacture of malt beverages — Rights conferred; separate revocation of licenses for sale of malt beverages for resale within and outside state authorized; effect of revocation on sale within state.

A license to manufacture malt beverages shall include the right to sell the product of the brewer for resale within and outside the limits of this state.

The right to sell the manufactured product to duly licensed wholesalers for resale within this state may be revoked separately from the right to manufacture and sell the product of such manufacturer for resale outside of this state.

The revocation by the state or by any other duly authorized licensing authority of the license to sell for resale within this state shall not in any way interfere with or otherwise affect or impair the license to manufacture and sell the product of the manufacturer for resale beyond the limits of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 657, § 2; Code 1933, § 5A-4508, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-24.1.
Exception to three-tier system; transfer of liquids; sales at brewer’s licensed premises; taxing; regulatory authority; conditions or limitations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Common ownership” means the same 100 percent common ownership interest including, but not limited to, ownership of the stock, limited liability company membership interest, limited liability partnership interest, other entity interest, or partnership interest, in whatever form such ownership interest may exist.

“Licensed premises” means the physical premises where brewer is licensed by the state as a manufacturer of malt beverages.

“Produces” means engaging in the material and essential aspects of the brewing process to manufacture malt beverage for human consumption; provided, however, when a brewer engages in the brewing process at multiple licensed premises, the malt beverage will be deemed to have been produced only at the licensed premises where such malt beverage first began fermentation through the chemical conversion of fermentable sugars into alcohol.

A limited exception to the provisions of this title providing a three-tier system for the distribution and sale of malt beverages shall exist to the extent that the license to manufacture malt beverages in this state shall include the right to sell malt beverages to individuals on the brewer’s licensed premises for personal use and not for resale, subject to the following terms and conditions:

The brewer may only make sales of malt beverages to an individual while the individual is physically on the brewer’s licensed premises where the brewer produces malt beverages;

The brewer may make sales of malt beverages the brewer produces at the brewer’s licensed premises where the individual is purchasing the malt beverages;

As long as the brewer and all of the brewer’s licensed premises are under common ownership, the brewer may make sales of malt beverages the brewer produces at any licensed premises of the brewer and subsequently transfers in compliance with the limitations and reporting obligations of subsection (c) of this Code section to the brewer’s licensed premises for sale where the individual is purchasing the malt beverages;

The brewer may only make sales of malt beverages for which the brewer is the sole owner of the brand and brand label;

Sales for consumption on the premises are not subject to a daily maximum amount;

Sales for consumption off the premises shall not exceed a maximum of 288 ounces of malt beverages per individual per day; and

The maximum amount of malt beverages the brewer may sell pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section in each calendar year shall be 6,000 barrels in the aggregate among all brewer’s licensed premises making such sales.

Nothing in this Code section shall be interpreted to prohibit a brewer from transferring any liquid, regardless of whether such liquid would be deemed to be malt beverages or not, to or from any of the brewer’s licensed premises; provided, however, with respect to any malt beverages a brewer produces at one of the brewer’s licensed premises and transfers to be sold to individuals pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section at another of the brewer’s licensed premises, the maximum number of barrels of malt beverages permitted to be transferred from one licensed premises of the brewer to another licensed premises of the brewer shall not exceed the number of barrels of malt beverages the brewer produces under brands and brand labels for which the brewer is the sole owner at the licensed premises receiving the transferred malt beverages and the brewer shall file a report with the department every calendar quarter documenting all such transfers in such form as the department shall require.

A brewer may sell malt beverages pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section on all days and at all times that sales of malt beverages by retailers are lawful within the county or municipality in which the licensed premises of the brewer is located, including, but not limited to, Sundays.

Any brewer engaging in sales of malt beverages pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall remit all state and local sales, use, and excise taxes to the proper tax collecting authority.

The commissioner shall promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as he or she may deem reasonable and necessary to effectuate the provisions of this Code section.

Upon a violation by a brewer of any provision of this Code section or this title or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, the commissioner shall have the power to place conditions or limitations on such brewer’s license and to modify or amend such conditions or limitations.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-24.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 8/SB 85; Ga. L. 2021, p. 493, § 2/HB 273.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective September 1, 2017.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 5, 2021, added subsection (a); redesignated former subsection (a) as present subsection (b); rewrote present subsection (b); added subsection (c); redesignated former subsections (b) through (e) as present subsections (d) through (g), respectively; and substituted “subsection (b)” for “subsection (a)” near the beginning of present subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2021, “pursuant to subsection (b)” was substituted for “pursuant to subsection (a)” in subsection (e).

3-5-25.
License for manufacture of malt beverages — Renewal.

Every unrevoked license authorizing the manufacture of malt beverages, whether issued by the state or by any other duly authorized licensing authority, shall be renewable to the holder of the license as of right upon the payment of fees and taxes lawfully assessed and fixed for the issuance of licenses of that kind and character.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 657, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-4509, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-25.1.
License for manufacture of malt beverages — Bond required on application for license or renewal.

The commissioner may require, in addition to other bonds required by this title, a bond to be filed with the application for a license or the renewal of a license, conditioned to pay all sums which may become due by the applicant to this state as taxes, license fees, or otherwise, by reason of or incident to, the operation of the business of the applicant and to comply with all the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to malt beverages. The bond shall be in such form and in such amount approved by the commissioner, not to exceed $5,000.00 for brewers and $500.00 for retailers.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-4510, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 44.

3-5-26.
Persons to whom malt beverages may be sold by wholesale dealers.

Licensed wholesale dealers may sell malt beverages only to other licensed wholesale dealers and to importers and retail dealers licensed in this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-4506, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-27.
Malt beverages acquired by retail dealers from persons other than licensed wholesale dealers declared contraband.

Any malt beverage possessed, sold, or offered for sale by a retail dealer which was purchased or otherwise acquired from any person other than a wholesale dealer authorized to do business under this chapter is declared to be contraband and shall be seized by the commissioner or the appropriate local authorities and disposed of by the commissioner in the manner provided in this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 185, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4504, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-28.
Delivery, receipt, and storage of malt beverages sold by wholesale dealers to retail dealers.

All malt beverages sold by a wholesale dealer to a retail dealer shall be delivered only to the premises of a licensed retail dealer and transported only by a conveyance owned, or leased, and operated by a wholesale dealer who is designated to deal in the brands of malt beverages sold and is licensed to make sales and deliveries within the municipality or county in which the sale or delivery is made. The malt beverages so sold shall not be delivered to, received, or stored at any place other than premises for which state and local retail licenses have been issued.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 185, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4505, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-29.
Brewer-wholesaler relations — “Agreement” defined.

As used in Code Sections 3-5-30 through 3-5-34, the term “agreement” shall mean a commercial relationship, not required to be evidenced in writing, of definite or indefinite duration between a brewer and a malt beverage wholesaler pursuant to which the wholesaler has been authorized to distribute one or more of the brewer’s brands of malt beverage.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 3.

3-5-30.
Brewer-wholesaler relations — Purpose; intent; enforcement.

Code Sections 3-5-31 through 3-5-34 are promulgated pursuant to the authority granted to the state under the provisions of the Twenty-first Amendment to the United States Constitution and specifically for the following purposes and policies:

To prohibit unfair business practices and to prevent any one segment of the malt beverage industry to gain unfair advantage over the other segments;

To foster vigorous and healthy interbrand competition in the malt beverage industry;

To provide an orderly three-tier system for the distribution and sale of good quality malt beverages in the State of Georgia;

To promote the public health, safety, and welfare of the people of the State of Georgia; and

To provide a distribution system for malt beverages that will facilitate the collection and accountability of state and local excise taxes.

The provisions of Code Sections 3-5-31 through 3-5-34 may not be varied by separate agreement and any such attempt shall be void and unenforceable as being violative of the public policy of this state.

The commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate such regulations as are consistent with the stated policies of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 2.

3-5-31.
Brewer-wholesaler relations — License requirement for shippers of beer; application.

No shipper shall be permitted to ship beer into the state without first obtaining a proper license from the commissioner in the manner provided in this title.

In addition to the bond required in Code Section 3-5-25.1 and such other documentation required by the commissioner pursuant to this title, each shipper shall:

Submit with his application one label for each brand of beer to be shipped for the first time by the shipper into the state;

Designate in the application for registration sales territories for each of its brands sold in Georgia; and

Name one licensed wholesaler in each territory who, within the territory, shall be the exclusive distributor of the brand within the territory.

Designations of wholesalers or wholesalers’ territories as provided in this Code section shall be initially approved by the commissioner and shall not be changed nor initially disapproved except for cause. The commissioner shall determine cause after a hearing under regulations promulgated by the commissioner for such purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 2.

3-5-32.
Brewer-wholesaler relations — Conflicts of interest.

No licensed registered brewer, broker, or importer authorized to do business in this state nor any of his employees or members of such brewer’s, broker’s, or importer’s immediate family shall have, own, or enjoy ownership interest in or partnership arrangement with the business of any wholesaler or retailer licensee. Cooperative advertising and incentive programs shall not be deemed to constitute a partnership agreement.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 2.

3-5-33.
Brewer-wholesaler relations — Prohibited acts.

No brewer, broker, or importer shall:

Induce or coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any wholesaler to accept delivery of any malt beverage which has not been ordered or agreed upon by the wholesaler, provided that recommendation, endorsement, exposition, persuasion, or argument shall not be deemed to constitute inducements, coercion, or requirements prohibited by this Code section;

Require a wholesaler to assent to any unreasonable requirement, condition, understanding, or term of an agreement limiting the wholesaler’s right to sell the product of any other brewer, broker, or importer;

Fix or maintain the price at which a wholesaler may resell beer, whether by the terms or requirements imposed on the wholesaler under an agreement or otherwise; or

Require or prohibit any change in the management or supervisory employees of a wholesaler unless the current or proposed employees fail to meet essential, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory requirements imposed by an agreement’s express terms.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 2.

3-5-34.
Brewer-wholesaler relations — Applicability of Code Sections 3-5-29 through 3-5-33.

Code Sections 3-5-29 through 3-5-33 shall apply to designations in effect on or after July 1, 1983.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1214, § 2.

3-5-35.
Declaration of policy; “brewpubs”.

The General Assembly reaffirms the policy of this state of strict enforcement of laws and regulations applicable to the manufacture or sale of beer, including without limitation those establishing the three-tier distribution system with prohibitions against ownership and employment interests between the three tiers but creates a limited exception for the operation of “brewpubs” as such term is defined in Code Section 3-1-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 734, § 3.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Brewpubs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Subject 560-2-8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, Code Section 3-5-35 as enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 486, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 3-5-38.

3-5-36.
“Brewpub” exception to three-tier distribution system.

A limited exception to the provisions of Code Sections 3-5-29 through 3-5-32 providing a three-tier system for the distribution and sale of malt beverages shall exist for owners and operators of brewpubs, subject to the following terms and conditions:

No individual shall be permitted to own or operate a brewpub without first obtaining a proper license from the commissioner in the manner provided in this title, and each brewpub licensee shall comply with all other applicable state and local license requirements;

A brewpub license authorizes the holder of such license to:

Manufacture on the licensed premises not more than 10,000 barrels of malt beverages in a calendar year solely for retail sale;

Operate an eating establishment that shall be the sole retail outlet for such malt beverages;

Operate an eating establishment that may offer for sale for consumption on the premises any other alcoholic beverages produced by other manufacturers which are authorized for retail sale under this title, including wine, distilled spirits, and malt beverages, provided that such alcoholic beverages are purchased from a licensed wholesaler; and, provided, further, that in addition to draft beer manufactured on the premises, each brewpub licensee shall offer for sale commercially available canned or bottled malt beverages from licensed wholesalers; and

Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph, sell up to a maximum of 5,000 barrels annually of such malt beverages to licensed wholesale dealers. Under no circumstances shall such malt beverages be sold by a brewpub licensee to any person holding a retail consumption dealer’s license or a retailer’s license for the purpose of resale;

Possession of a brewpub license shall not prevent the holder of such license from obtaining a retail consumption dealer’s license or a retailer’s license for the same premises;

A brewpub license holder shall not be prohibited from selling wine or malt beverages by the package for consumption off the premises where so permitted by resolution or ordinance of the county or municipality;

The commissioner shall not issue a brewpub license if the premises to be licensed is located in a county or municipality in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is prohibited; and

A brewpub licensee shall:

Pay all state and local license fees and excise taxes applicable to individuals licensed by this state as manufacturers, retailers, and, where applicable, wholesalers under this title;

At the request of the commissioner, provide an irrevocable letter of credit or bond in favor of the State of Georgia in an amount sufficient to guarantee such brewpub licensee’s estimated tax liability for the first year of operation; and

Measure malt beverages manufactured on the premises and otherwise comply with applicable rules and regulations respecting excise and enforcement tax determination of such malt beverages as required by this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1514, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 680, § 2/HB 472; Ga. L. 2015, p. 317, § 7/SB 63; Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 9/SB 85.

The 2017 amendment,

effective September 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (4) for the former provisions, which read: “A brewpub license does not authorize the holder of such license to sell alcoholic beverages by the package for consumption off the premises;”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, semicolons were substituted for periods at the end of paragraphs (2) through (5) and “and” was added at the end of former paragraph (6) [now paragraph (5).

3-5-37.
“Brewpub” exception; rules and regulations.

The Department of Revenue shall be authorized to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary to carry out or make effective the provisions of Code Sections 3-5-35 and 3-5-36.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 734, § 3.

3-5-38.
[Repealed] Permits for free tasting of malt beverages during educational and promotional brewery tours; merchandising; fees for tours; selling of beverages; administration.

History.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1514, § 1A; Ga. L. 2015, p. 317, § 8/SB 63; repealed by Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 10/SB 85, effective September 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 3(3)/SB 365, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, repealed the reservation of this Code section, effective May 8, 2018.